Massachusetts, session 194th, H2918.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 101A the following section:-
Section 101B. (a) Any permanent, full-time, call, volunteer, intermittent, part-time or
reserve firefighter may participate in any bladder, cervical, lung or testicular cancer screening or
evaluation upon the referral of such firefighter’s primary care physician.
Such screenings or evaluations shall be deemed to be medically necessary for the
purposes of coverage by any insurance plan, including but not limited to, any such firefighter
insured under chapter 32A, 175, 176A, 176B or 176G or any other general or special law.
of 2

(b) Screening or evaluation services performed under this section shall be covered by
such insurance plan for the cost of the screening or evaluation and shall not be subject to any co-
payment, deductible, coinsurance or other cost-sharing requirement.
of 2